dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="an/nan__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>nan</l>       <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nat</l>       <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dre</l>       <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dra</l>       <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ing/en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/enna__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>enna</l>      <r>enna<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enne</l>      <r>enna<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>etta</l>      <r>enna<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essa</l>      <r>enna<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="all__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- PT: Oegentlig för svenska; This is a bit strange for Swedish. Should we really use it? -->
<pardef n="all__predet">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="predet"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="predet"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="predet"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="var/dera__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>dera</l>      <r>dera<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tdera</l>     <r>dera<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="allting__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="varenda__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="samm/a__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="båda__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ingenting__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="så/dan__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>dan</l>       <r>dan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l>         <r>dan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="mång/a__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>a<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="var/annan__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>annan</l>     <r>annan<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tannat</l>    <r>annan<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Added from the pair is-sv BEGIN -->

<pardef n="samtliga__prn">
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="varifrån__prn">
  <e a="is">       <p><l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Added from the pair is-sv END -->

    <!-- Adjectives -->

<pardef n="övrig__adj">  <!-- This is broken, should be det.ind, but then we have problems in transfer -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="hög__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>re</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sta</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fri__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>are</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ast</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>aste</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aste</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="all">             <i>all</i><par n="all__prn"/></e>
<e lm="all">             <i>all</i><par n="all__predet"/></e>
<e lm="allting">         <i>allting</i><par n="allting__prn"/></e>
<e lm="annan">           <i>an</i><par n="an/nan__prn"/></e>
<e lm="denna">           <i>d</i><par n="d/enna__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ingen">           <i>ing</i><par n="ing/en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="båda">            <i>båda</i><par n="båda__prn"/></e>
<e lm="envar">           <i>envar</i><par n="allting__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ingenting">       <i>ingenting</i><par n="ingenting__prn"/></e>
<e lm="många">           <i>mång</i><par n="mång/a__prn"/></e>
<e lm="sådan">           <i>så</i><par n="så/dan__prn"/></e>
<e lm="samma">           <i>samm</i><par n="samm/a__prn"/></e>
<e lm="varannan">        <i>var</i><par n="var/annan__prn"/></e>
<e lm="vardera">         <i>var</i><par n="var/dera__prn"/></e>
<e lm="varenda">         <i>varenda</i><par n="varenda__prn"/></e>
<e lm="densamma" a="is"> <i>densamm</i><par n="samm/a__prn"/></e>
<e lm="samtliga" a="is"> <i>samtliga</i><par n="samtliga__prn"/></e>
<e lm="bägge" a="is">    <i>bägge</i><par n="båda__prn"/></e>
<e lm="varifrån" a="is"> <i>varifrån</i><par n="varifrån__prn"/></e>
<e lm="övrig">           <i>övrig</i><par n="övrig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fri">             <i>fri</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hög">             <i>hög</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå">              <i>rå</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ny">              <i>ny</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ganska ny" a="is"><i><g>ganska<b/></g>ny</i><par n="fri__adj"/></e>
